Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-312
Special assessment; mailing of notice; requirements.

The county clerk, city clerk, clerk of any political subdivision, except any city of the metropolitan class, or any other person upon whom the duty is imposed by law to publish notice required by law in regard to any special assessment by a special taxing district shall mail by certified mail with return receipt requested a copy of such notice to be published to the last-known address as shown on the current tax rolls of each nonresident property owner.

Laws 1973, LB 344, § 3;

Laws 1974, LB 655, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1218.